Washington statutes.
RCW 19.370.020

Requirement to register.

A performing rights society that licenses the performing rights to music may not license or attempt to license the use of or collect or attempt to collect any compensation on account of any sale, license, or other disposition regarding the performance rights of music unless the performing rights society:

(1) Registers and files annually with the department of licensing an electronic copy of each performing rights form agreement providing for the payment of royalties made available from the performing rights society to any proprietor within the state; and

(2) Has a valid Washington unified business identifier number.

[ 2016 c 38 s 2.]